Utah statutes.
70A-9a-314.    Perfection by control.

(1)  A security interest in investment property, deposit accounts, letter-of-credit rights, or electronic chattel paper, or electronic documents may be perfected by control of the collateral under Section 70A-7a-106, 70A-9a-104, 70A-9a-105, 70A-9a-106, or 70A-9a-107.

(2)  A security interest in deposit accounts, electronic chattel paper, or letter-of-credit rights, or electronic documents is perfected by control under Section 70A-7a-106, 70A-9a-104, 70A-9a-105, or 70A-9a-107 when the secured party obtains control and remains perfected by control only while the secured party retains control.

(3)  A security interest in investment property is perfected by control under Section 70A-9a-106 from the time the secured party obtains control and remains perfected by control until:

(a)  the secured party does not have control; and

(b)  one of the following occurs:

(i)  if the collateral is a certificated security, the debtor has or acquires possession of the security certificate;

(ii)  if the collateral is an uncertificated security, the issuer has registered or registers the debtor as the registered owner; or

(iii)  if the collateral is a security entitlement, the debtor is or becomes the entitlement holder.



Amended by Chapter 42, 2006 General Session

